Utah statutes.
58-41-9.   Grounds for denial of license -- Resumption of practice.

(1)  Grounds for refusal to issue a license to an applicant, for refusal to renew the license of a licensee, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, to issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and to issue cease and desist orders shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.

(2)  After one year from the date of revocation of a license, application may be made to the board for relicensing.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 297, 1993 General Session

